New York, session 2025-2026, A4381.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 112 of the education law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 1-a to read as follows: 3 1-a. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, cred- 4 its awarded by educational programs provided by facilities operated by 5 the office of children and family services shall be accepted as transfer 6 credits by any school within the state of New York. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08341-01-5